apertium-pwn.pwn.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E F G H I J K L Ɬ M N O P Q R S T U Ʉ V W X Y Z %ʼ
 a b c d e f g h i j k l ɬ m n o p q r s t u ʉ v w x y z
 %{A%}:a %{A%}:u  
 %{N%}:n %{N%}:m
 %{j%}:j %{j%}:0
 %{u%}:a %{u%}:0
 %{t%}:t %{t%}:0 
 %{a%}:a %{a%}:0
 %{e%}:e %{e%}:0
 %{i%}:i %{i%}:0
 %>:0 ;

Sets

Vowel = A E I O U Ʉ Y
        a e i o u ʉ y ;

Rules

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"{N} manifests as m before labial"
%{N%}:m <=> _ [ p | b | v ]: ;

! "remove t if u a"
! %{t%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{u%}: %{A%}: ;

"remove u if no t"
%{u%}:0 <=> :0 %>: _ ;

"remove jif u a"
%{j%}:0 <=> _ %>: a: ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
